Hawaii statutes.
§514A-88
Compliance with covenants, bylaws, and administrative provisions. Each apartment owner, tenants and employees of
an owner, and other persons using the property shall comply strictly with the
bylaws and with the administrative rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto, as either of the same may be lawfully amended from time to time, and
with the covenants, conditions, and restrictions set forth in the declaration.
Failure to comply with any of the same shall be ground for an action to recover
sums due, for damages or injunctive relief, or both, maintainable by the
manager or board of directors on behalf of the association of apartment owners
or, in a proper case, by an aggrieved apartment owner. [L 2007, c 244, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next